Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2082YH (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. 288 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 68A.507 Contribution limits for 1 candidates. 2 1. For the purposes of this section, âelection campaign 3 cycleâ means the time period between elections for a particular 4 office. Each primary, general, and special election is a 5 separate election campaign cycle. Separate contribution limits 6 for each type of election for a particular office, including 7 primary, general, and special elections, apply in an election 8 campaign cycle. 9 2. An individual shall not make, and a candidate, 10 candidateâs committee, or anyone acting on behalf of any 11 candidate or candidateâs committee shall not accept, any 12 contribution which will cause the total amount of the 13 individualâs contributions to a candidate or candidateâs 14 committee to exceed the amounts set forth in 11 C.F.R. pt. 110 15 in an election campaign cycle. 16 3. This section applies to candidates for any public office 17 in this state. 18